District of Columbia statutes.
32-514

Encouragement of more generous leave policies.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to discourage an employer from the adoption or retention of a family and medical leave policy more generous than the family and medical leave required by this chapter.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 15, 37 DCR 5043
1981 Ed., § 36-1314.